Washington statutes.
RCW 6.25.010

Application of chapter to district courts.

Unless otherwise expressly provided, all the provisions of this chapter governing attachment of personal property apply to proceedings before district courts of this state, but the district courts shall not have power to issue writs of attachment against real property or any interest in real property or against vendors' interests under real estate contracts.

[ 1987 c 442 s 801.]